Utah statutes.
11-13-102.   Purpose of chapter.

The purpose of this chapter is:

(1)  to permit local governmental units to make the most efficient use of their powers by enabling them to cooperate with other localities on a basis of mutual advantage and thereby to provide services and facilities in a manner and under forms of governmental organization that will accord best with geographic, economic, population and other factors influencing the needs and development of local communities; and

(2) to provide the benefit of economy of scale, economic development, and utilization of natural resources for the overall promotion of the general welfare of the state.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 286, 2002 General Session

